Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-106 Creation of association.
There is created a nonprofit unincorporated legal entity to be known as the
Hawaii insurance guaranty association. All insurers defined as member insurers
in section 431:16-105 shall be and remain members of the association as a
condition of their authority to transact the business of insurance in this
State. The association shall perform its function under a plan of operation
established and approved under section 431:16-109 and shall exercise its powers
through a board of directors established under section 431:16-107. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 93, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next